Maryland, session 2026, HB0369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–318.
(K) (1) TO ENCOURAGE THE LOCATION AND DEVELOPMENT OF BUSINESS
OPERATIONS AND EXPANSION OF THE EMPLOYMENT BASE IN PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY, THE GOVERNING BODY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY MAY GRANT, BY
LAW, A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON
ANY PROPERTY OWNED OR LEASED BY A NEW BUSINESS THAT CREATES 10 OR MORE
FULL–TIME JOBS IN AN INDUSTRY TARGETED FOR EXPANSION BY THE PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0369*

HOUSE BILL 369
(2) A TAX CREDIT GRANTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE
GRANTED FOR MORE THAN 10 YEARS.
(3) THE GOVERNING BODY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY MAY
ESTABLISH, BY LAW:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT;
(III) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT;
(IV) REGULATIONS AND PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION
AND UNIFORM PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE TAX CREDIT; AND
(V) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.